Washington statutes.
RCW 32.35.010

Incorporators—Paid-in capital stock, surplus, and undivided profits—Requirements.

When authorized by the director, one or more natural persons, citizens of the United States, may incorporate a stock savings bank in the manner prescribed under this chapter. No stock savings bank may incorporate for less amount nor commence business unless it has a paid-in capital stock, surplus and undivided profits in the amount as may be determined by the director after consideration of the proposed location, management, and the population and economic characteristics for the area, the nature of the proposed activities and operation of the stock savings bank, and other factors deemed pertinent by the director. Before commencing business, each stock savings bank shall have subscribed and paid into it in the same manner as is required for capital stock, an amount equal to at least ten percent of the capital stock required, that shall be carried in the undivided profit account and may be used to defray organization and operating expenses of the company. Any sum not so used shall be transferred to the surplus fund of the company before any dividend shall be declared to the stockholders.

[ 1999 c 14 s 1.]